Washington statutes.
RCW 39.102.150

Issuance of general obligation bonds. (Expires June 30, 2044.)

(1) A sponsoring local government that has designated a revenue development area and instead of paying public improvement costs on a pay-as-you-go basis has been authorized the use of local infrastructure financing may incur general indebtedness, including issuing general obligation bonds, to finance the public improvements and retire the indebtedness in whole or in part from local excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax allocation revenues, and sales and use taxes imposed under the authority of RCW 82.14.475 that it receives, subject to the following requirements:

(a)(i) The ordinance adopted by the sponsoring local government and authorizing the use of local infrastructure financing indicates an intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated; and

(ii) The sponsoring local government includes this statement of the intent in all notices required by RCW 39.102.100; or

(b) The sponsoring local government adopts a resolution, after opportunity for public comment, that indicates an intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the general indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this section may be payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and credit of the local government, and nontax income, revenues, fees, and rents from the public improvements, as well as contributions, grants, and nontax money available to the local government for payment of costs of the public improvements or associated debt service on the general indebtedness.

(b) A sponsoring local government that issues bonds under this section may not pledge any money received from the state of Washington for the payment of such bonds, other than the local sales and use taxes imposed under the authority of RCW 82.14.475 and collected by the department.

(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this section, a sponsoring local government designating a revenue development area and authorizing the use of local infrastructure financing may require the nonpublic participant to provide adequate security to protect the public investment in the public improvement within the revenue development area.

(4) Bonds issued under this section must be authorized by ordinance of the governing body of the sponsoring local government and may be issued in one or more series and must bear such date or dates, be payable upon demand or mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form either coupon or registered as provided in RCW 39.46.030, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption with or without premium, be secured in such manner, and have such other characteristics, as may be provided by such ordinance or trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.

(5) The sponsoring local government may annually pay into a fund to be established for the benefit of bonds issued under this section a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any local excise tax allocation revenues and local property tax allocation revenues derived from property or business activity within the revenue development area containing the public improvements funded by the bonds, such payment to continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full. The local government may also annually pay into the fund established in this section a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any revenues derived from taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.475, such payment to continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full. Revenues derived from taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.475 are subject to the use restriction in RCW 39.102.130.

(6) In case any of the public officials of the sponsoring local government whose signatures appear on any bonds or any coupons issued under this chapter cease to be such officials before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures, nevertheless, are valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such officials had remained in office until such delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued under this chapter are fully negotiable.

(7) Notwithstanding subsections (4) through (6) of this section, bonds issued under this section may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 21 s 4; 2009 c 267 s 6; 2007 c 229 s 10; 2006 c 181 s 501.]

NOTES:

Application—Severability—2007 c 229: See notes following RCW 39.102.020.